North Carolina statutes. Chapter 110. Child Welfare.
Article 9. Child Support.
§ 110-133.
Agreements of support.

In lieu of or in conclusion of any legal proceeding instituted to obtain support from a responsible parent for a dependent child born of the marriage, a written agreement to support the child by periodic payments executed by the responsible parent when acknowledged before a certifying officer or notary public or the equivalent or corresponding person of the state, territory, or foreign country where the acknowledgment is made and filed with and approved by a judge of the district court in the county where the custodial parent of the child resides or is found, or in the county where the noncustodial parent resides or is found, or in the county where the child resides or is found shall have the same force and effect, retroactively and prospectively, in accordance with the terms of the agreement, as an order of support entered by the court, and shall be enforceable and subject to modification in the same manner as is provided by law for orders of the court in such cases. A responsible parent executing a written agreement under this section shall provide on the agreement the responsible parent’s social security number.

History.

1975, c. 827, s. 1; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1186, s. 7; 1995, c. 538, s. 5; 1997-433, s. 4.8; 1998-17, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Family Law—Lovers’ Triangle Turns Bermuda Triangle: The Natural Father’s Right to Rebut the Marital Presumption—Michael H. v. Gerald D.,” see 25 Wake Forest L. Rev. 617 (1990).

§ 110-134.
Filing of affidavits, agreements, and orders; fees.

All affidavits, agreements, and resulting orders entered into under the provisions of

G.S. 110-132

and

G.S. 110-133

shall be filed by the clerk of superior court in the county in which they are entered. The filing fee for the institution of an action through the entry of an order under either of these provisions shall be in an amount equal to that provided in G.S. 7A-308(a)(18).

History.

1975, c. 827, s. 1; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1186, s. 8; 2001-237, s. 3; 2010-31, s. 15.6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-31, s. 15.6, effective July 1, 2010, substituted “shall be in an amount equal to that provided in G.S. 7A-308(a)(18)” for “shall be four dollars ($4.00).”

§ 110-135.
Debt to State created.

Acceptance of public assistance by or on behalf of a dependent child creates a debt, in the amount of public assistance paid, due and owing the State by the responsible parent or parents of the child. Provided, however, that in those cases in which child support was required to be paid incident to a court order during the time of receipt of public assistance, the debt shall be limited to the amount specified in such court order. This liability shall attach only to public assistance granted subsequent to June 30, 1975, and only with respect to the period of time during which public assistance is granted, and only if the responsible parent or parents were financially able to furnish support during this period.

The United States, the State of North Carolina, and any county within the State which has provided public assistance to or on behalf of a dependent child shall be entitled to share in any sum collected under this section, and their proportionate parts of such sum shall be determined in accordance with the matching formulas in use during the period for which assistance was paid.

No action to collect such debt shall be commenced after the expiration of five years subsequent to the receipt of the last grant of public assistance. The county attorney or an attorney retained by the county and/or State shall represent the State in all proceedings brought under this section.

A past-due public assistance debt as described in this section may be deemed negotiable and subject to reduction if the public assistance debt is not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) and the responsible parent continues to be obligated to pay current child support. Upon agreement between the State and the responsible parent, and upon approval of the court upon an inquiry into the financial status of the obligor, the responsible parent shall pay all child support payments, including payments due on child support arrears, entered by a valid court order for a 24-month period of time. Upon the timely payment of each court-ordered child support obligation during the full 24-month period, including payments due on child support arrears, the State shall reduce the responsible parent’s public assistance debt by two-thirds. If the responsible parent is late or defaults on any single payment during the 24-month period, no portion of the public assistance debt shall be reduced. The responsible parent may attempt to achieve 24 consecutive months of child support payments as often as possible in order to reduce his or her public assistance debt. However, once the responsible parent’s public assistance debt has been reduced by two-thirds because of the successful completion of this agreement, the responsible parent shall no longer be eligible for this program. The reduction of public assistance debt as set forth in this section shall be in addition to all other remedies available to the State for the retirement of the debt. This program shall not prevent the State from taking any and all other measures available by law.

Upon the termination of a child support obligation due to the death of the obligor, the Department shall determine whether the obligor’s estate contains sufficient assets to satisfy any child support arrearages. If sufficient assets are available, the Department shall attempt to collect the arrearage.

History.

1975, c. 827, s. 1; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1186, ss. 9, 10; 2003-288, s. 1.1; 2005-389, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-389, s. 2, effective December 12, 2005, added the fourth paragraph.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1980 constitutional law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1097 (1981).

For note on default not constituting an admission of facts for purposes of summary judgment, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 49 (1981).

For article, “Using Hindsight to Change Child Support Obligations: A Survey of Retroactive Modification and Reimbursement of Child Support in North Carolina,” see 10 Campbell L. Rev. 111 (1987).

§ 110-136.
Garnishment for enforcement of child-support obligation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, in any case in which a responsible parent is under a court order or has entered into a written agreement pursuant to

G.S. 110-132

or 110-133 to provide child support, a judge of the district court in the county where the mother of the child resides or is found, or in the county where the father resides or is found, or in the county where the child resides or is found may enter an order of garnishment whereby no more than forty percent (40%) of the responsible parent’s monthly disposable earnings shall be garnished for the support of his minor child. For purposes of this section, “disposable earnings” is defined as that part of the compensation paid or payable to the responsible parent for personal services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise (including periodic payments pursuant to a pension, retirement, or other deferred compensation program) which remains after the deduction of any amounts required by law to be withheld. The garnishee is the person, firm, association, or corporation by whom the responsible parent is employed.

The mother, father, custodian, or guardian of the child or any designated representative interested in the support of a dependent child may move the court for an order of garnishment. The motion shall be verified and shall state that the responsible parent is under court order or has entered into a written agreement pursuant to

G.S. 110-132

or 110-133 to provide child support, that said parent is delinquent in such child support or has been erratic in making child-support payments, the name and address of the employer of the responsible parent, the responsible parent’s monthly disposable earnings from said employer (which may be based upon information and belief), and the amount sought to be garnished, not to exceed forty percent (40%) of the responsible parent’s monthly disposable earnings. The motion for the wage garnishment order along with a motion to join the alleged employer as a third-party garnishee defendant shall be served on both the responsible parent and the alleged employer in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 1A-1

, Rules of Civil Procedure. The time period for answering or otherwise responding to pleadings, motions and other papers issued pursuant to this section shall be in accordance with the time periods set forth in

G.S. 1A-1

, Rules of Civil Procedure, except that the alleged employer third-party garnishee shall have 10 days from the date of service of process to answer both the motion to join him as a defendant garnishee and the motion for the wage garnishment order.

(b1)

In addition to the foregoing method for instituting a continuing wage garnishment proceeding for child support through motion, the mother, father, custodian, or guardian of the child or any designated representative interested in the support of a dependent child may in an independent proceeding petition the court for an order of continuing wage garnishment. The petition shall be verified and shall state that the responsible parent is under court order or has entered into a written agreement pursuant to

G.S. 110-132

or 110-133 to provide child support, that said parent is delinquent in such child support or has been erratic in making child-support payments, the name and address of the alleged-employer garnishee of the responsible parent, the responsible parent’s monthly disposable earnings from said employer (which may be based on information and belief), and the amount sought to be garnished, not to exceed forty percent (40%) of the responsible parent’s monthly disposable earnings. The petition shall be served on both the responsible parent and his alleged employer in accordance with the provisions for service of process set forth in G.S. 1A-1, Rule 4. The time period for answering or otherwise responding to process issued pursuant to this section shall be in accordance with the time periods set forth in G.S. 1A-1, Rules of Civil Procedure.

Following the hearing held pursuant to this section, the court may enter an order of garnishment not to exceed forty percent (40%) of the responsible parent’s monthly disposable earnings. If an order of garnishment is entered, a copy of same shall be served on the responsible parent and the garnishee either personally or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. The order shall set forth sufficient findings of fact to support the action by the court and the amount to be garnished for each pay period. The amount garnished shall be increased by an additional one dollar ($1.00) processing fee to be assessed and retained by the employer for each payment under the order. The order shall be subject to review for modification and dissolution upon the filing of a motion in the cause.

Upon receipt of an order of garnishment, the garnishee shall transmit without delay to the State Child Support Collection and Disbursement Unit the amount ordered by the court to be garnished. These funds shall be disbursed to the party designated by the court which in those cases of dependent children receiving public assistance shall be the North Carolina Department of Health and Human Services.

Any garnishee violating the terms of an order of garnishment shall be subject to punishment as for contempt.

History.

1975, c. 827, s. 1; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1186, ss. 11, 12; 1979, c. 386, ss. 1-8; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1047, s. 1; 1985, c. 660, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1999-293, s. 17.

Cross References.

As to garnishment of military benefits, see 10 U.S.C. § 1408 and 42 U.S.C. § 659.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on the remedy of garnishment in child support, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 169 (1978).

For survey of 1978 family law, see 57 N.C.L. Rev. 1084 (1979).

For article, “Using Hindsight to Change Child Support Obligations: A Survey of Retroactive Modification and Reimbursement of Child Support in North Carolina,” see 10 Campbell L. Rev. 111 (1987).

§ 110-136.1.
Assignment of wages for child support.

Pursuant to G.S. 50-13.4(f) (1), the court may require the responsible parent to execute an assignment of wages, salary, or other income due or to become due whenever his employer’s voluntary written acceptance of the wage assignment under

G.S. 95-31

is filed with the court. Such acceptance remains effective until the employer files an express written revocation with the court. The amount assigned shall be increased by an additional one dollar ($1.00) processing fee to be assessed and retained by the employer for each payment under the order.

History.

1981, c. 275, s. 7; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1047, s. 2.

§ 110-136.2.
Use of unemployment compensation benefits for child support.

A responsible parent may voluntarily assign unemployment compensation benefits to a child support agency to satisfy a child support obligation or a child support enforcement agency may request a responsible parent to voluntarily assign unemployment benefits to satisfy a child support obligation. An assignment of less than the full amount of the support obligation shall not relieve the responsible parent of liability for the remaining amount.

Upon notification of a voluntary assignment by the Department of Health and Human Services, the Division of Employment Security shall deduct and withhold the amount assigned by the responsible parent as provided in G.S. 96-17.

Any amount deducted and withheld shall be paid by the Division of Employment Security to the Department of Health and Human Services for distribution as required by federal law.

Voluntary assignment of unemployment compensation benefits shall remain effective until the Division of Employment Security receives notification from the Department of Health and Human Services of an express written revocation by the responsible parent.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall ensure that payments received under this section are properly credited against the responsible parent’s child support obligation.

In the absence of a voluntary assignment of unemployment compensation benefits, the Department of Health and Human Services shall implement income withholding as provided in this Article for IV-D cases. The amount withheld shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the unemployment compensation benefits. Notice of the requirement to withhold shall be served upon the Division and payment shall be made by the Division directly to the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to G.S. 96-17 or to another state under

G.S. 52C-5-501

. Except for the requirement to withhold from unemployment compensation benefits and the forwarding of withheld funds to the Department of Health and Human Services or to another state under

G.S. 52C-5-501

, the Division is exempt from the provisions of

G.S. 110-136.8

.

History.

1983, c. 33, s. 1; 1987, c. 764, ss. 1, 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1999-293, s. 6; 2011-401, s. 3.14.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-401, s. 3.14, effective November 1, 2011, in subsections (b) through (d), substituted “Division of Employment Security” for “Employment Security Commission”; and throughout subsection (f), substituted “Division” for “Employment Security Commission.”

§ 110-136.3.
Income withholding procedures; applicability.

Required Contents of Support Orders.— Required Contents of Support Orders. All child support orders, civil or criminal, entered or modified in the State in IV-D cases shall include a provision ordering income withholding to take effect immediately. All child support orders, civil or criminal, initially entered in the State in non-IV-D cases on or after January 1, 1994, shall include a provision ordering income withholding to take effect immediately as provided in G.S. 110-136.5(c1), unless one of the exceptions specified in G.S. 110-136.5(c1) applies. A non-IV-D child support order that contains an income withholding requirement and a IV-D child support order shall comply with each of the following:

Require the obligor to keep the clerk of court or IV-D agency informed of the obligor’s current residence and mailing address.

, (2a) Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 517, s. 1.

Require the obligor to cooperate fully with the initiating party in the verification of the amount of the obligor’s disposable income.

Require the custodial party to keep the obligor informed of the custodial party’s disposable income and the amount and effective date of any substantial change in this disposable income.

(4a)

Include the current residence and mailing address of the custodial parent, or the address of the child if the address of the custodial parent and the address of the child are different. However, there is no requirement that the child support order contain the address of the custodial parent or the child if (i) there is an existing order prohibiting disclosure of the custodial parent’s or child’s address to the obligor or (ii) the court has determined that notice to the obligor is inappropriate because the obligor has made verbal or physical threats that constitute domestic violence under Chapter 50B of the General Statutes.

Require the obligor to keep the initiating party informed of the name and address of any payor of the obligor’s disposable income and of the amount and effective date of any substantial change in this disposable income.

(a1)

Payment Plan/Work Requirement for Past-Due Support.—

In any IV-D case in which an obligor owes past-due support and income withholding has been ordered but cannot be implemented against the obligor, the court may order the obligor to pay the support in accordance with a payment plan approved by the court and, if the obligor is subject to the payment plan and is not incapacitated, the court may order the obligor to participate in such work activities, as defined under 42 U.S.C. § 607, as the court deems appropriate.

When obligor subject to withholding.

In IV-D cases in which a new or modified child support order is entered on or after October 1, 1989, an obligor is subject to income withholding immediately upon entry of the order. In IV-D cases in which the child support order was entered prior to October 1, 1989, an obligor shall become subject to income withholding on the date on which the obligor fails to make legally obligated child support payments in an amount equal to the support payable for one month, or the date on which the obligor or obligee requests withholding.

In non-IV-D cases in which the child support order was entered prior to January 1, 1994, an obligor shall be subject to income withholding on the earliest of:

The date on which the obligor fails to make legally obligated child support payments in an amount equal to the support payable for one month;

The date on which the obligor requests withholding; or

The date on which the court determines, pursuant to a motion or independent action filed by the obligee under G.S. 110-136.5(a), that the obligor is or has been delinquent in making child support payments or has been erratic in making child support payments.

In IV-D child support cases in which an order was issued or modified in this State prior to October 1, 1996, and in which the obligor is not otherwise subject to withholding, the obligor shall become subject to withholding if the obligor fails to make legally obligated child support payments in an amount equal to the support payable for one month.

In the enforcement of alimony or postseparation support orders pursuant to

G.S. 110-130.2

, an obligor shall become subject to income withholding on the earlier of:

The date on which the obligor fails to make legally obligated alimony or postseparation payments; or

The date on which the obligor or obligee requests withholding.

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 517, s. 1.

Interstate cases.— An interstate case is one in which a child support order of one state is to be enforced in another state.

In interstate cases withholding provisions shall apply to a child support order of this or any other state. A petition addressed to this State to enforce a child support order of another state or a petition from an initiating party in this State addressed to another state to enforce a child support order entered in this State shall include:

A certified copy of the support order with all modifications, including any income withholding notice or order still in effect;

A copy of the income withholding law of the jurisdiction which issued the support order, provided that this jurisdiction has a withholding law;

A sworn statement of arrearages;

The name, address, and social security number of the obligor, if known;

The name and address of the obligor’s employer or of any other source of income of the obligor derived in the state in which withholding is sought; and

The name and address of the agency or person to whom support payments collected by income withholding shall be transmitted.

The law of the state in which the support order was entered shall apply in determining when withholding shall be implemented and interpreting the child support order. The law and procedures of the state where the obligor is employed shall apply in all other respects.

Except as otherwise provided by subdivision (2), income withholding initiated under this subsection is subject to all of the notice, hearing and other provisions of Chapter 110.

In all interstate cases notices and orders to withhold shall be served upon the payor by a North Carolina agency or judicial officer. In all interstate non-IV-D cases, the advance notice to the obligor shall be served pursuant to

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4, Rules of Civil Procedure.

For purposes of enforcing a petition under this subsection, jurisdiction is limited to the purposes of income withholding and Chapter 52A of the General Statutes shall not apply. Nothing in this subsection precludes any remedy otherwise available in a proceeding under Chapter 52A of the General Statutes.

(d1)

Recodified as § 110-139(c1) by Session Laws 2001-237, s. 5, effective June 23, 2001.

Procedures and regulations.— Procedures, rules, regulations, forms, and instructions necessary to effect the income withholding provisions of this Article shall be established by the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services or the Secretary’s designee and the Administrative Office of the Courts. Forms and instructions shall be sent with each order or notice of withholding.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 949, s. 2; 1987, c. 589, s. 1; 1989, c. 601, s. 2; 1993, c. 517, s. 1; 1997-433, ss. 3, 6.1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-17, s. 1; 1998-176, s. 4; 2000-140, s. 20(b); 2001-237, s. 5; 2014-115, s. 44.5.

§ 110-136.4.
Implementation of withholding in IV-D cases.

Withholding based on arrearages or obligor’s request.

Advance notice of withholding. When an obligor in a IV-D case becomes subject to income withholding, the obligee shall, after verifying the obligor’s current employer or other payor, wages or other disposable income, and mailing address, serve the obligor with advance notice of withholding in accordance with

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4, Rules of Civil Procedure.

Contents of advance notice. The advance notice to the obligor shall contain, at a minimum, the following information:

Whether the proposed withholding is based on the obligor’s failure to make legally obligated child support, alimony or postseparation support payments on the obligor’s request for withholding, on the obligee’s request for withholding, or on the obligor’s eligibility for withholding under G.S. 110-136.3(b)(3);

The amount of overdue child support, overdue alimony or postseparation support payments, the total amount to be withheld, and when the withholding will occur;

The name of each child or person for whose benefit the child support, alimony or postseparation support payments are due and information sufficient to identify the court order under which the obligor has a duty to support the child, spouse, or former spouse;

The amount and sources of disposable income;

That the withholding will apply to the obligor’s wages or other sources of disposable income from current payors and all subsequent payors once the procedures under this section are invoked;

An explanation of the obligor’s rights and responsibilities pursuant to this section;

That withholding will be continued until terminated pursuant to

G.S. 110-136.10

.

Contested withholding. The obligor may contest the withholding only on the basis of a mistake of fact, except that G.S. 110-129(10)(a) is not applicable if withholding is based on the obligor’s or obligee’s request for withholding. To contest the withholding, the obligor must, within 10 days of receipt of the advance notice of withholding, request a hearing in the county where the support order was entered before the district court and give notice to the obligee specifying the mistake of fact upon which the hearing request is based. If the asserted mistake of fact can be resolved by agreement between the obligee and the obligor, no hearing shall occur. Otherwise, a hearing shall be held and a determination made, within 30 days of the obligor’s receipt of the advance notice of withholding, as to whether the asserted mistake of fact is valid. No withholding shall occur pending the hearing decision. The failure to hold a hearing within 30 days shall not invalidate an otherwise properly entered order. If it is determined that a mistake of fact exists, no withholding shall occur. Otherwise, within 45 days of the obligor’s receipt of the advance notice of withholding, the obligee shall serve the payor, pursuant to

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 5, Rules of Civil Procedure, or by electronic transmission in compliance with the federal Office of Child Support Enforcement (OCSE) electronic income withholding (e-IWO) procedures, with notice of his obligation to withhold, and shall mail a copy of such notice to the obligor and file a copy with the clerk. In the event of appeal, withholding shall not be stayed. If the appeal is concluded in favor of the obligor, the obligee shall promptly repay sums wrongfully withheld and notify the payor to cease withholding.

Uncontested withholding. If the obligor does not contest the withholding within the 10-day response period, the obligee shall serve the payor, pursuant to G.S. 1A-1, Rule 5, Rules of Civil Procedure, or by electronic transmission in compliance with the federal Office of Child Support Enforcement (OCSE) electronic income withholding (e-IWO) procedures, with notice of his obligation to withhold, and shall mail a copy of such notice to the obligor and file a copy with the clerk.

Payment not a defense to withholding. The payment of overdue support shall not be a basis for terminating or not implementing withholding.

Inability to implement withholding. When an obligor is subject to withholding, but withholding under this section cannot be implemented because the obligor’s location is unknown, because the extent and source of his disposable income cannot be determined, or for any other reason, the obligee shall either request the clerk of superior court to initiate enforcement proceedings under G.S. 15A-1344.1(d) or G.S. 50-13.9(d) or take other appropriate available measures to enforce the support obligation.

Immediate income withholding. When a new or modified child support order is entered, the district court judge shall, after hearing evidence regarding the obligor’s disposable income, place the obligor under an order for immediate income withholding. The IV-D agency shall serve the payor pursuant to

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 5, Rules of Civil Procedure, or by electronic transmission in compliance with the federal Office of Child Support Enforcement (OCSE) electronic income withholding (e-IWO) procedures, with a notice of his obligation to withhold, and shall mail a copy of such notice to the obligor and file a copy with the clerk. If information is unavailable regarding an obligor’s disposable income, or the obligor is unemployed, or an agreement is reached between both parties which provides for an alternative arrangement, immediate income withholding shall not apply. The obligor, however, is subject to income withholding pursuant to G.S. 110-136.4(a).

Subsequent payors. If the obligor changes employment or source of disposable income, notice to subsequent payors of their obligation to withhold shall be served as required by

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 5, Rules of Civil Procedure or by electronic transmission in compliance with the federal Office of Child Support Enforcement (OCSE) electronic income withholding (e-IWO) procedures. Copies of such notice shall be filed with the clerk of court and served upon the obligor by first class mail.

Multiple withholdings. The obligor must notify the obligee if the obligor is currently subject to another withholding for child support. In the case of two or more withholdings against one obligor, the obligee or obligees shall attempt to resolve any conflict between the orders in a manner that is fair and equitable to all parties and within the limits specified by

G.S. 110-136.6

. If the conflict cannot be so resolved, an injured party, upon request, shall be granted a hearing in accordance with the procedure specified in G.S. 110-136.4(c). The conflict between the withholding orders shall be resolved in accordance with

G.S. 110-136.7

.

Modification of withholding. When an order for withholding has been entered under this section, the obligee may modify the withholding based on changed circumstances. The obligee shall proceed as is provided in this section.

Applicability of section. The provisions of this section apply to IV-D cases only.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 949, s. 2; 1989, c. 601, s. 3; 1997-433, s. 6.2; 1998-17, s. 1; 1998-176, s. 5; 2001-237, s. 4; 2015-62, s. 2(b); 2015-117, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-62, s. 2(b), effective June 5, 2015, inserted “or by electronic transmission in compliance with the Federal Office of Child Support Enforcement (OCSE) electronic income withholding (e-IWO) procedures,” in subdivisions (a)(3), (a)(4), and in subsections (b) and (c).

Session Laws 2015-117, s. 4, effective June 24, 2015, inserted “or by electronic transmission in compliance with the federal Office of Child Support Enforcement (OCSE) electronic income withholding (e-IWO) procedures,” in subdivisions (a)(3) and (a)(4), and in subsections (b) and (c).

§ 110-136.5.
Implementation of withholding in non-IV-D cases.

Withholding based on delinquent or erratic payments. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when an obligor is delinquent in making child support payments or has been erratic in making child support payments, the obligee may apply to the court, by motion or in an independent action, for an order for income withholding.

The motion or complaint shall be verified and state, to the extent known:

Whether the obligor is under a court order to provide child support and, if so, information sufficient to identify the order;

Either:

That the obligor is currently delinquent in making child support payments; or

That the obligor has been erratic in making child support payments;

The amount of overdue support and the total amount sought to be withheld;

The name of each child for whose benefit support is payable; and

The name, location, and mailing address of the payor or payors from whom withholding is sought and the amount of the obligor’s monthly disposable income from each payor.

The motion or complaint shall include or be accompanied by a notice to the obligor, stating:

That withholding, if implemented, will apply to the obligor’s current payors and all subsequent payors; and

That withholding, if implemented, will be continued until terminated pursuant to

G.S. 110-136.10

.

At any time the parties may agree to income withholding by consent order.

Withholding Based on Obligor’s Request. The obligor may request at any time that income withholding be implemented. The request may be made either verbally in open court or by written request.

A written request for withholding shall state:

That the obligor is under a court order to provide child support, and information sufficient to identify the order;

Whether the obligor is delinquent and the amount of any overdue support;

The name of each child for whose benefit support is payable;

The name, location, and mailing address of the payor or payors from whom the obligor receives disposable income and the amount of the obligor’s monthly disposable income from each payor;

That the obligor understands that withholding, if implemented, will apply to the obligor’s current payors and all subsequent payors and will be continued until terminated pursuant to

G.S. 110-136.10

; and

That the obligor understands that the amount withheld will include an amount sufficient to pay current child support, an additional amount toward liquidation of any arrearages, and a two dollar ($2.00) processing fee to be retained by the employer for each withholding, but that the total amount withheld may not exceed the following percent of disposable income:

Forty percent (40%) if there is only one order for withholding;

Forty-five percent (45%) if there is more than one order for withholding and the obligor is supporting other dependent children or his or her spouse; or

Fifty percent (50%) if there is more than one order for withholding and the obligor is not supporting other dependent children or a spouse.

A written request for withholding shall be filed in the office of the clerk of superior court of the court that entered the order for child support. If the request states and the clerk verifies that the obligor is not delinquent, the court may enter an order for withholding without further notice or hearing. If the request states or the clerk finds that the obligor is delinquent, the matter shall be scheduled for hearing unless the obligor in writing waives his right to a hearing and consents to the entry of an order for withholding of an amount the court determines to be appropriate. The court may require a hearing in any case. Notice of any hearing under this subdivision shall be sent to the obligee.

Order for withholding. If the district court judge finds after hearing evidence that the obligor, at the time of the filing of the motion or complaint was, or at the time of the hearing is, delinquent in child support payments or that the obligor has been erratic in making child support payments in accordance with G.S. 110-136.5(a), or that the obligor has requested that income withholding begin in accordance with G.S. 110-136.5(b), the court shall enter an order for income withholding, unless:

The obligor proves a mistake of fact, except that G.S. 110-129(10)(a) is not applicable if withholding is based on the obligee’s motion or independent action alleging that the obligor is delinquent or has been erratic in making child support payments; or

The court finds that the child support obligation can be enforced and the child’s right to receive support can be ensured without entry of an order for income withholding; or

The court finds that the obligor has no disposable income subject to withholding or that withholding is not feasible for any other reason.

If the obligor fails to respond or appear, the court shall hear evidence and enter an order as provided herein.

(c1)

Immediate income withholding. In non-IV-D cases in which a child support order is initially entered on or after January 1, 1994, an obligor is subject to income withholding immediately upon entry of the order, unless either of the following applies:

One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding.

A written agreement is reached between the parties that provides for an alternative arrangement.

The term “good cause” as used in this subsection includes a reasonable and workable plan for consistent and timely payments by some means other than income withholding. In considering whether a plan is reasonable, the court may consider the obligor’s employment history and record of meeting financial obligations in a timely manner.In entering an order for immediate income withholding under this subsection, the court shall follow the requirements and procedures as specified in other sections of this Article, including amount to be withheld, multiple withholdings, notice to payor, and termination of withholding.

Notice to payor and obligor. If an order for income withholding is entered, a notice of obligation to withhold shall be served on the payor as required by

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 5, Rules of Civil Procedure. Copies of such notice shall be filed with the clerk of court and served upon the obligor by first class mail.

Modification of withholding. When an order for withholding has been entered under this section, any party may file a motion seeking modification of the withholding based on changed circumstances. The clerk or the court on its own motion may initiate a hearing for modification when it appears that modification of the withholding is required or appropriate.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 949, s. 2; 1987, c. 60; 1989, c. 601, s. 4; 1993, c. 517, s. 2; 1999-293, s. 18; 2001-487, s. 72.

§ 110-136.6.
Amount to be withheld.

Computation of amount. When income withholding is implemented pursuant to this Article, the amount to be withheld shall include:

An amount sufficient to pay current child support; and

An additional amount toward liquidation of arrearages; and

A processing fee of two dollars ($2.00) to cover the cost of withholding, to be retained by the payor for each withholding unless waived by the payor.

The amount withheld may also include court costs and attorneys fees as may be awarded by the court in non-IV-D cases and as may be awarded by the court in IV-D cases pursuant to

G.S. 110-130.1

.

Limits on amount withheld. Withholding for current support, arrearages, processing fees, court costs, and attorneys fees shall not exceed forty percent (40%) of the obligor’s disposable income for one pay period from the payor when there is one order of withholding. The sum of multiple withholdings, for current support, arrearages, processing fees, court costs, and attorneys fees shall not exceed:

Forty-five percent (45%) of disposable income for one pay period from the payor in the case of an obligor who is supporting his spouse or other dependent children; or

Fifty percent (50%) of disposable income for one pay period from the payor in the case of an obligor who is not supporting a spouse or other dependent children.

(b1)

When there is an order of income withholding for current or delinquent payments of alimony or postseparation support or for any portion of the payments, the total amount withheld under this Article and under

G.S. 50-16.7

shall not exceed the amounts allowed under section 303(b) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1673(b).

Contents of order and notice. An order or advance notice for withholding and any notice to a payor of his obligation to withhold shall state a specific monetary amount to be withheld and the amount of disposable income from the applicable payor on which the amount to be withheld was determined. The notice shall clearly indicate that in no event shall the amount withheld exceed the appropriate percentage of disposable income paid by a payor as provided in subsection (b).

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 949, s. 2; 1998-176, s. 6.